Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1175.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1802-F of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1802-F. Legislative intent.It is the intent of this article to invest in innovation as a catalyst for economic growth. Investment in the Ben Franklin Technology Development Authority, the Ben Franklin Technology 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 Partners, regional biotechnology research centers, the [department] life sciences industry, workforce development programs and venture capital funds will advance the competitiveness of this Commonwealth's companies in the global economy.Section 2. The definition of "recipient" in section 1803-F of the act is amended to read:Section 1803-F. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Recipient." An entity that receives a distribution of funds under section 1811-F(c) or section 1811-F(d).* * *Section 3. Section 1805-F(b) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1805-F. Duties.* * *(a.1) Sale of additional tax credits.--The department may sell up to $350,000,000 in tax credits to qualified taxpayers. The sale of the tax credits shall be in accordance with section 1808-F.(b) Time of sale.--The sale authorized under subsection (a) may not occur before October 1, 2013. The sale authorized under subsection (a.1) may not occur prior to October 1, 2026.Section 4. Section 1806-F(a) of the act is amended and subsection (d) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 1806-F. Use of tax credits by qualified taxpayers.(a) Use against insurance premiums tax liability.--A 20260SB1175PN1516 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 qualified taxpayer that purchases tax credits under [section 1805-F] section 1805-F(a) may claim the credits beginning in calendar year 2017 against insurance premiums tax liability incurred for a taxable year that begins on or after January 1, 2016. A qualified taxpayer that purchases tax credits under section 1805-F(a.1) may claim the credits beginning in calendar year 2030 against insurance premiums tax liability incurred for a taxable year that begins on or after January 1, 2029.* * *(d) Limitations.--The following shall apply:* * *(1.1) The total amount of tax credits applied against insurance premiums tax liability by all qualified taxpayers in a fiscal year may not exceed $70,000,000 per year beginning in calendar year 2030.* * *Section 5. Sections 1807-F(a) and 1808-F(g) of the act are amended to read:Section 1807-F. Sale, carryover and carryback.(a) Carryover.--If the qualified taxpayer cannot use the entire amount of the tax credit for the taxable year in which the taxpayer is eligible for the credit, the excess may be carried over to succeeding taxable years and used as a credit against the qualified tax liability of the taxpayer for those taxable years, provided that the credit may not be carried over to any taxable year that begins after December 31, 2025[.], for tax credits sold under section 1805-F(a) and after December 31, 2034, for tax credits sold under section 1805-F(a.1).* * *Section 1808-F. Sale of tax credits to qualified taxpayers.20260SB1175PN1516 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *(g) Limitation.--No tax credits may be sold under section 1805-F(a) if the bidding process, upon completion, has failed to yield at least $40,000,000 in revenue. No tax credits may be sold under section 1805-F(a.1) if the bidding process, upon completion, has failed to yield at least $200,000,000 in revenue.Section 6. Section 1811-F of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1811-F. Innovate in PA Program.* * *(d) Second distribution.--The department shall distribute the net proceeds received by the department as a result of the sale of tax credits under section 1805-F(a.1) as follows:(1) Forty percent to the Commonwealth Financing Authority for grants or loans to support the construction of commercial lab space, incubators, applied research and development facilities and related public improvement and public interest projects in the surrounding community.(2) Eight percent to the department for grants to life science companies and institutions of higher education for recruitment and retention initiatives to attract and retain exceptional life science researchers in this Commonwealth.(3) Ten percent to the Department of Labor and Industry, in collaboration with the department, the Department of Education and the Department of Human Services, for grants to fund:(i) New partnerships between biotechnology and life science companies, training providers and educational institutions at all levels to create training programs 20260SB1175PN1516 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that are free, accessible and open to students and adults with a high school education and no previous experience.(ii) Programs that provide opportunities to prepare a diverse range of students from diverse backgrounds for careers in the biotechnology or life sciences sector via quality internships for undergraduate and graduate students from historically underrepresented or economically disadvantaged communities, including programs that offer curriculum and training support with refined "hard" skills in the sciences and "soft" skills of professional and personal development.(iii) Programs designed for 11th and 12th grade students from historically underrepresented or economically disadvantaged communities and have an interest in biotechnology or life sciences research. Programs would combine intensive lab training with opportunities for students to connect with paid six-week summer internships in cutting-edge academic and industry research labs. Eligible programs under this subparagraph would include programs that prepare students to go directly into the workforce or into higher education in STEM fields.(iv) Programs that provide personalized entrepreneurial education for first-time founders of biotechnology or life science ventures of any development stage. Programs will focus on individual needs and utilize accredited entrepreneur coaches and expert mentors to craft unique, educational experiences crucial to the development of successful ventures, while assisting them with networking with partners in the 20260SB1175PN1516 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 health care system, biotechnology and life science community in a cooperative learning environment.(4) Seven percent to the Ben Franklin Technology Partners Program for use according to program guidelines.(5) Twenty-five percent to the Venture Investment Program for use according to program guidelines, including traditional venture investments or impact investments. The authority may consider impact investments based on performance. Impact investments may not exceed 15% of the Venture Investment Program distribution under this paragraph.(6) Ten percent to the three regional biotechnology research centers for distribution in equal proportions to each regional biotechnology research center.Section 7. Sections 1812-F and 1813-F(b) introductory paragraph of the act are amended to read:Section 1812-F. Guidelines.The department, in consultation with the Commonwealth Financing Authority, the Department of Labor and Industry, the Department of Education, the Department of Human Services, the authority and each regional biotechnology research center, shall promulgate guidelines implementing this article.Section 1813-F. Report.* * *(b) Contents.--The report under subsection (a) shall apply to the distribution under section 1811-F(c) and include the following:* * *Section 8. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1814-F. Second distribution report.(a) Duties.--On or before January 1, 2027, and January 1 of 20260SB1175PN1516 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 each subsequent year, the department, in consultation with the Commonwealth Financing Authority, the Department of Labor and Industry, the Department of Education, the Department of Human Services, the authority and each regional biotechnology research center, shall:(1) Submit a report on the implementation of the program to all of the following:(i) The Governor.(ii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(iii) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(2) Publish the report under paragraph (1) on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(b) Contents.--The report under subsection (a) shall apply to the distribution under section 1811-F(d) and include:(1) The name of the purchaser of premiums tax credits.(2) The amount of premiums tax credits allocated to the purchaser.(3) The amount of capital the purchaser contributed for the issuance of the tax credit certificate.(4) The amount of any tax credits that have been transferred under section 1810-F(e).(5) The amount of funds received by the recipients during the previous year.(6) The cumulative amount of capital received by the department in connection with the sale of the tax credits.(7) The amount of capital remaining uninvested at the end of the preceding calendar year.20260SB1175PN1516 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) The names and locations of businesses or other entities receiving capital from the recipients, whether the investment was a grant or a loan, the reason for the investment and the amount of the investment.(9) The total number of jobs created in this Commonwealth by the investment and the average wages paid for the jobs.(10) The total number of jobs retained in this Commonwealth as a result of the investment and the average wages paid for the jobs.(11) The total number of individuals participating in the programs under section 1811-F(d)(3).Section 9. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1175PN1516 - 8 - 12345678910111213